Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.140

Record of proceedings.

The board of county commissioners shall cause to be recorded, in a book kept for that purpose, all their proceedings and determinations touching all matters properly cognizable before it; and all books, accounts, vouchers, and papers, touching the business or property of the county shall be carefully kept by the clerk, and be open to public inspection.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.32.140. Prior: Code 1881 s 2675; 1869 p 305 s 13; 1867 p 54 s 13; 1863 p 542 s 13; 1854 p 421 s 13; RRS s 4072.]